Washington statutes.
RCW 19.194.020

Record of transactions—Provided upon request—Forms and format—Lost or stolen hardware.

(1) Upon request, every retailer doing business in this state that accepts for trade-in or exchange computer hardware shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the record of all transactions conducted, under RCW 19.194.010, on the proceeding [preceding] day. These transactions shall be recorded on such forms as may be provided and in such format as may be required by the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer within a specified time but not less than twenty-four hours.

(2) If a retailer has good cause to believe that any computer hardware in their possession has been previously lost or stolen, the retailer shall promptly report that fact to the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when, and the name of the person from whom, it was received.

[ 1998 c 134 s 2.]